Wisconsin, session 2025, AB368.
do enact as follows:AB368,11Section 1. 632.85 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB368,2,32632.85 (title) Coverage without prior authorization for treatment of 3an emergency medical condition; other conditions.AB368,24Section 2. 632.85 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB368,3,41632.85 (1) (d) “Urgent health care service” means a health care service for 2which the application of the time for making a nonexpedited request for prior 3authorization, in the opinion of a physician or other health care provider with 4knowledge of the covered person’s medical condition, could do any of the following:AB368,3,651. Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the covered person or the ability of 6that person to regain maximum function.AB368,3,872. Subject the covered person to severe pain that cannot be adequately 8managed without the care or treatment that is the subject of the utilization review.AB368,39Section 3. 632.85 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB368,3,1510632.85 (3) A health care plan or a self-insured health plan that is required to 11provide the coverage under sub. (2) may not require prior authorization for the 12provision or coverage of the emergency medical services specified in sub. (2), any 13covered service that is incidental to a covered surgical service and determined by 14the covered person’s physician or other health care provider to be medically 15necessary, or any covered health care service that is an urgent health care service.AB368,416Section 4. 632.851 of the statutes is created to read:AB368,3,1817632.851 Prior authorization; general; physical, occupational, speech 18therapy and chiropractic care. (1) In this section:AB368,3,2019(a) “Chronic pain” means persistent or recurring pain lasting 3 months or 20longer.AB368,3,2221(b) “Episode of care” means treatment for a new or recurring condition for 22which an insured has not been treated within the previous 90 days.AB368,3,2323(c) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.745 (11).AB368,4,21(d) “Self-insured health plan” means a self-insured health plan of the state or 2a county, city, village, town, or school district.AB368,4,43(2) A health benefit plan or self-insured health plan that uses prior 4authorization procedures may not do any of the following:AB368,4,95(a) Require prior authorization for the first 12 physical therapy, occupational 6therapy, speech therapy, or chiropractic visits with no duration of care limitation. A 7plan may require prior authorization for visits after the initial 12 physical therapy, 8occupational therapy, speech therapy, or chiropractic visits of an episode of care for 9a specific condition.AB368,4,1310(b) Require prior authorization for any physical therapy, occupational therapy, 11or chiropractic care for the nonpharmacologic management of pain provided to 12individuals with chronic pain for the first 90 days of treatment not to exceed a 13frequency of twice per week per service.AB368,4,1614(3) A health benefit plan or self-insured health plan that provides coverage of 15physical therapy services, occupational therapy services, speech therapy services, 16or chiropractic services shall do all of the following with respect to such services:AB368,4,1917(a) Reference the applicable policy and include an explanation to the service 18provider and, in plain language, to the covered individual for any denial of coverage 19or reduction in covered services.AB368,4,2320(c) When a copay or coinsurance is required, impose copayment and 21coinsurance amounts on covered individuals for the services that are equivalent to 22copayment and coinsurance amounts imposed on covered individuals for primary 23care services under the plan.AB368,5,71(4) Every health benefit plan or self-insured health plan, when requested to 2authorize coverage following completion of the initial 12 visits described under sub. 3(2) (a) or subsequent to a request for reauthorization of coverage, shall issue a 4decision on reauthorization within 3 business days of receiving the request. If a 5health benefit plan or self-insured health plan does not issue a decision on 6reauthorization described under this subsection within 3 business days of receiving 7the request, prior authorization is assumed to be granted for the service.AB368,5,108(5) Every utilization review organization and utilization management 9organization that is providing review or management on behalf of a health benefit 10plan or self-insured health plan shall do all of the following:AB368,5,1511(a) Provide to any licensed health care provider upon request all medical 12evidence-based policy information that accompanies the algorithms that are used to 13manage coverage. A utilization review organization or utilization management 14organization may not use claims data as evidence of outcomes for purposes of 15developing an algorithm to manage coverage or an approval policy for coverage.AB368,5,1816(b) Operate and staff peer review activities with health care providers that 17are licensed in this state and hold credentials for the type of service that is the 18subject of the review.AB368,5,1919